Wisconsin, session 2025, SB262.
do enact as follows:SB262,11Section 1. 146.93 of the statutes is created to read:SB262,2,32146.93 Referral agencies for certain assisted living facilities. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB262,2,64(a) “Assisted living facility” means a community-based residential facility, as 5defined in s. 50.01 (1g), a residential care apartment complex, as defined in s. 50.01 6(6d), or an adult family home, as defined in s. 50.01 (1) (b).SB262,2,97(b) “Electronic” includes an audio recording that conforms with chs. 901 to 8911, that is maintained by a referral agency, and that is transmitted to an assisted 9living facility and a resident in a format that can be downloaded.SB262,2,1210(c) “Referral agency” means a person that provides to a prospective resident a 11referral to an assisted living facility for a fee that is collected from the assisted 12living facility. “Referral agency” does not include any of the following:SB262,2,13131. An assisted living facility or its employees.SB262,2,16142. A resident, a resident’s family member, or a patron of an assisted living 15facility who refers a prospective resident to an assisted living facility and receives a 16discount or other remuneration from the assisted living facility.SB262,2,1817(d) “Resident” means a resident of an assisted living facility and includes any 18representative of a resident of an assisted living facility.SB262,3,31(2) Disclosure requirement. (a) A referral agency shall disclose, in the 2format prescribed in par. (c), to a prospective resident at the time or before any 3referral is made to an assisted living facility all of the following:SB262,3,641. The existence of any current business relationship or any common 5ownership or control and any other financial, business, management, or familial 6relationship that exists between the referral agency and the assisted living facility.SB262,3,872. That the assisted living facility pays a fixed referral fee to the referral 8agency in connection with the referral.SB262,3,1093. The amount of the fixed referral fee that the assisted living facility will pay 10to the referral agency in connection with the referral.SB262,3,12114. That the referral agency lists on its website only assisted living facilities 12with which the referral agency has a contractual relationship.SB262,3,16135. That the prospective resident may at any time terminate all services 14provided to the prospective resident by a referral agency, including the use of the 15prospective resident’s personal information, by providing a written or electronic 16termination notice to the referral agency.SB262,3,2017(b) After the first instance of the referral agency providing the disclosure 18required by par. (a), the referral agency shall request from the prospective resident 19an acknowledgement of receipt of the disclosure in the same manner and form in 20which the disclosure was delivered.SB262,3,2321(c) The referral agency’s disclosure under par. (a) shall be oral, electronic, or in 22writing, shall be substantially as follows, and, if written, shall be in 14-point font 23type:SB262,4,21Wisconsin law requires that we provide you with the following disclosure 2notice:SB262,4,113We are in the business of referring residents to community-based residential 4facilities, residential care apartment complexes, and adult family homes. We will 5be paid by the facility if you move into one of the referred facilities. The fixed 6referral fee we receive from the facility into which you move will be $.... (insert 7amount). We (do/do not) have a current business relationship (but/and) we (do/do 8not) have a common ownership or control in, or any other financial, business, 9management, or familial relationship with, (any/one or more) of the facilities to 10which we are referring you. We (do/do not) list on our website only those facilities 11with which we have a contractual relationship.SB262,4,1512By providing us with a written or electronic notice, you have the right to 13terminate our services to you at any time, including our use of your personal 14information. If you terminate our services, we will not be entitled to any fee for any 15move-in you make after the date of the termination notice.SB262,4,2116(3) Additional requirements. (a) A referral agency may charge and collect 17a fee from an assisted living facility participating in its services only if that fee is set 18in advance, is consistent with the fair market value for the information services 19provided by the referral agency, and is not based on the potential value of a 20prospective resident to an assisted living facility or on the value of or a percentage 21of the value of a professional service provided by the assisted living facility.SB262,5,222(b) A referral agency may charge and collect a fee from an assisted living 1facility only after a resident confirms in writing that the resident utilized the 2referral agency to move into the referred assisted living facility.SB262,5,73(c) No agreement between a referral agency and an assisted living facility for 4a referral of a particular prospective resident to the assisted living facility may be 5for a term greater than one year. The referral agency may not charge or collect a fee 6related to the referral from the referred assisted living facility if the prospective 7resident moves into the assisted living facility after the agreement expires.SB262,5,98(d) A referral agency may charge or collect from an assisted living facility only 9one fee per resident referred by the referral agency to the assisted living facility.SB262,5,1310(4) Termination by resident. A prospective resident may at any time 11terminate all services provided to the prospective resident by a referral agency, 12including the use of the prospective resident’s personal information, by providing a 13written or electronic termination notice to the referral agency.SB262,5,1514(5) Penalty. A referral agency that violates this section may be required to 15forfeit not more than $1,000 for each violation.SB262,5,1916(6) Injunction. The attorney general or the district attorney of the 17appropriate county may, in addition to any other remedies, bring an action in the 18name and on behalf of the state against a referral agency to restrain and enjoin a 19violation of this section.SB262,220Section 2. Initial applicability.SB262,5,2221(1) This act first applies to a contract that is entered into, renewed, or 22modified on the effective date of this subsection.SB262,5,2323